Georgia, session 2025_26, HB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2A of Chapter 2 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
registration and licensing of fleet vehicles, is amended by adding a new Code section to read
as follows:
"40-2-53.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 257
- 1 -

LC 39 4554
(1) 'Eligible rental vehicle fleet owner' means a corporation or firm enrolled in a fleet
registration plan pursuant to this article and which is certified as a rental motor vehicle
concern by the commissioner.
(2) 'Rental motor vehicle concern' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 48-5C-1.
(b) Within 15 days of receipt of a proper application by an eligible rental vehicle fleet
owner for the issuance of metal fleet motor vehicle license plates prior to vehicle
registration upon a form and in a manner determined by the commissioner, the department
shall provide such applicant with metal fleet motor vehicle license plates for the operation
of vehicles in a fleet enrolled pursuant to this article.
(c) The department shall develop and provide a system for the assignment and registration
of motor vehicles by an eligible rental vehicle fleet owner from the metal fleet motor
vehicle license plates provided pursuant to this Code section.
(d) An eligible rental vehicle fleet owner issued metal fleet motor vehicle license plates
pursuant to this Code section shall ensure the metal fleet motor vehicle license plates are
securely stored. The license plates issued pursuant to this Code section shall be revoked
and confiscated upon a determination after a hearing that an eligible rental vehicle fleet
owner failed to comply with the requirements of this subsection."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 257
- 2 -